Hawaii statutes.
§386-206 Premium payment; reserves.
(a) Each group shall establish to the satisfaction of the insurance
commissioner a premium payment plan which shall include an initial payment by
each member of at least twenty-five per cent of that member's annual premium
before the start of the group's fund year and payment of the balance of each
member's annual premium in monthly or quarterly installments.

(b) Each group shall establish and maintain
actuarially appropriate loss reserves, which shall include reserves for known
claims and expenses associated therewith and claims incurred but not reported
and expenses associated therewith.

(c) Each group shall establish and maintain
bad debt reserves based on the historical experience of the group or other
groups. [L 1986, c 304, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next